Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3236
Districts; appointment as fiscal agent of United States; powers.

Each district shall have the power and authority to accept appointment of the district as fiscal agent of the United States, or authorization of the district by the United States to make collections of money for and on behalf of the United States in connection with any federal project, whereupon the district shall have full power to do any and all things required by the federal statutes in connection therewith, and all things required by the rules and regulations established by any department of the federal government in regard thereto.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 36, p. 123.